Utah statutes.
26-21b-301.   Investigation and enforcement.
(1)  The department may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(2)  The department shall, in an expeditious manner, investigate any complaint
received by the department regarding the failure of a health care facility to
comply with a requirement of this chapter.
(3)  If the department finds a violation of this chapter, or any rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter, the department may take one or more of the actions
described in Section 26-21-11.
